FST/guessLexc.lexc
LEXICON VerbSubjComp
	+1SG:n%^		VerbPostSubj;
	+1PL:tu%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+2SG:u%^		VerbPostSubj;
	+2PL:mu%^	VerbPostSubj;
        +3SG:a%^         VerbPostSubj;
	+3SG:ya%^		VerbPostSubj;
        +3PL:ba%^        VerbPostSubj;
	+CL1:a%^		VerbPostSubj;
	+CL2:ba%^	VerbPostSubj;
        +CL3:u%^         VerbPostSubj;
	+CL4:i%^	        VerbPostSubj;
	+CL5:ri%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+CL6:a%^	        VerbPostSubj;
	+CL7:ki%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+CL7:iki%^ 	VerbPostSubj;
	+CL8:bi%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+CL8:ibi%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+CL9:i%^		VerbPostSubj;
	+CL9:za%^		VerbPostSubj;
	+CL1%0:zi%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+CL1%0:za%^		VerbPostSubj;
        +CL11:ru%^       VerbPostSubj;
        +CL12:ka%^       VerbPostSubj;
        +CL13:tu%^       VerbPostSubj;
	+CL14:bu%^	VerbPostSubj;
        +CL15:ku%^       VerbPostSubj;
	+CL16:ha%^	VerbPostSubj;
	+INF:ku%^	VerbStemHelper;
	0:0		DefectiveVerb;
	

LEXICON VerbPostSubj
	+NEG:ta%^	VerbTense;
	0:0            DefectiveVerb;
	VerbTense;

Lexicon VerbTense
        +CONT:racya%^	VerbAlso;
        +CONS:ka%^       VerbAlso;
        +IMM.PAST:ra%^	VerbAlso;
	+RMT.PAST:ara%^	VerbAlso;
	+RCT.PAST:a%^	VerbAlso;
	+COND:a%^	VerbAlso;
        +HAB.PAST:a%^    VerbAlso;
	+PRES.PROG:ra%^		VerbAlso;
        +PRES.HAB:0            VerbAlso;
	+PRES.STAT.HAB:0	VerbAlso;
	+PRES.STAT.PROG:ra%^	VerbAlso;
	+FUT:za%^		VerbAlso;

LEXICON VerbAlso
	+ALSO:na%^	VerbObj1;
	VerbObj1;

LEXICON VerbObj1
        +OBJ.1SG:n%^	VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.1SG:ni%^	VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.1PL:ku%^	VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.2SG:ba%^	VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.2PL:tu%^	VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.CL1:mu%^    VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.CL2:ba%^	VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL3:wu%^    VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL4:yi%^    VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL5:ri%^    VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL6:ya%^    VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.CL7:ki%^	VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.CL8:bi%^	VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL9:yi%^    VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL1%0:zi%^   VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL11:ru%^   VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL12:ka%^   VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL13:tu%^   VerbObj2;
	+OBJ.CL14:bu%^	VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL15:ku%^   VerbObj2;
        +OBJ.CL16:ha%^   VerbObj2;
	0:0		VerbRefl;

LEXICON VerbObj2
        +OBJ.1SG:n%^	VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.1SG:ni%^	VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.1PL:ku%^	VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.2SG:ba%^	VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.2PL:tu%^	VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.CL1:mu%^  VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.CL2:ba%^	VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL3:wu%^    VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL4:yi%^    VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL5:ri%^    VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL6:ya%^    VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.CL7:ki%^	VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.CL8:bi%^	VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL9:yi%^    VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL1%0:zi%^   VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL11:ru%^   VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL12:ka%^   VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL13:tu%^   VerbObj3;
	+OBJ.CL14:bu%^	VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL15:ku%^   VerbObj3;
        +OBJ.CL16:ha%^   VerbObj3;
	VerbRefl;
	
LEXICON VerbObj3
        +OBJ.1SG:n%^	VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.1SG:ni%^	VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.1PL:ku%^	VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.2SG:ba%^	VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.2PL:tu%^	VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.CL1:mu%^    VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.CL2:ba%^	VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL3:wu%^    VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL4:yi%^    VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL5:ri%^    VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL6:ya%^    VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.CL7:ki%^	VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.CL8:bi%^	VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL9:yi%^    VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL1%0:zi%^   VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL11:ru%^   VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL12:ka%^   VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL13:tu%^   VerbRefl;
	+OBJ.CL14:bu%^	VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL15:ku%^   VerbRefl;
        +OBJ.CL16:ha%^   VerbRefl;
	VerbRefl;

LEXICON VerbRefl
	+REFL:i%$	VerbStemHelper;
	VerbStemHelper;

LEXICON VerbStemHelper
	+:0		VerbStem;
	+:0		VerbPastStem;
	0:0            DefectiveVerb;
	+:0		MonosyllPassCaus;
        +GUESS+:0       VerbGuess;

LEXICON VerbGuess
        a		VerbGuess;
	b		VerbGuess;
	c		VerbGuess;
	d		VerbGuess;
	e		VerbGuess;
	f		VerbGuess;
	g		VerbGuess;
	h		VerbGuess;
	i		VerbGuess;
	j		VerbGuess;
	k		VerbGuess;
	l		VerbGuess;
	m		VerbGuess;
	n		VerbGuess;
	o		VerbGuess;
	p		VerbGuess;
	q		VerbGuess;
	r		VerbGuess;
	s		VerbGuess;
	t		VerbGuess;
	u		VerbGuess;
	v		VerbGuess;
	w		VerbGuess;
	x		VerbGuess;
	y		VerbGuess;
	z		VerbGuess;
	0:0		VerbGuessEnd;

LEXICON VerbGuessEnd
	b		GuessAppl;
	c		GuessAppl;
	d		GuessAppl;
	e		GuessAppl;
	f		GuessAppl;
	g		GuessAppl;
	h		GuessAppl;
	i		GuessAppl;
	j		GuessAppl;
	k		GuessAppl;
	l		GuessAppl;
	m		GuessAppl;
	n		GuessAppl;
	o		GuessAppl;
	p		GuessAppl;
	q		GuessAppl;
	r		GuessAppl;
	s		GuessAppl;
	t		GuessAppl;
	u		GuessAppl;
	v		GuessAppl;
	w		GuessAppl;
	x		GuessAppl;
	y		GuessAppl;
	z		GuessAppl;
	
LEXICON GuessAppl
	0:0		VerbAppl;
	0:%@		PastVerbAppl;

LEXICON MonosyllPassCaus
	b:ba		MonosyllEnd;
	c:ci		MonosyllEnd;
	gw:gu		MonosyllEnd;
	h:ha		MonosyllEnd;
	jy:gi		MonosyllEnd;
	kw:ko		MonosyllEnd;
	nny:ne		MonosyllEnd;
	nyw:nyo		MonosyllEnd;
	pf:pfu		MonosyllEnd;
	ry:ri		MonosyllEnd;
	shy:shi		MonosyllEnd;
	sy:se		MonosyllEnd;
	t:ta		MonosyllEnd;
	v:vu		MonosyllEnd;
	z:zi		MonosyllEnd;
	
LEXICON MonosyllEnd
	+PASS:%#bw%^	MonosyllAspect;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^sh%^	MonosyllAspect;
	
LEXICON MonosyllAspect
	+IMP:a		VerbIntensive;
	+PERF:e		VerbIntensive;

LEXICON VerbAppl
	+BEN:%^ir			VerbAppl2;
	+RECIP:%^an			VerbAppl2;
	+RECIP:%^any			VerbAppl2;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	VerbAppl2;
        +NEUT:%^ik               VerbAppl2;
        +REV:%^ur                VerbAppl2;
        +REV:%^uk                VerbAppl2;
	VerbPass;
	
LEXICON VerbAppl2
	+BEN:%^ir			VerbAppl3;
	+RECIP:%^an			VerbAppl3;
	+RECIP:%^any			VerbAppl3;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	VerbAppl3;
        +NEUT:%^ik               VerbAppl3;
        +REV:%^ur                VerbAppl3;
        +REV:%^uk                VerbAppl3;
	VerbPass;
	
LEXICON VerbAppl3
	+BEN:%^ir			VerbAppl4;
	+RECIP:%^an			VerbAppl4;
	+RECIP:%^any			VerbAppl4;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	VerbAppl4;
        +NEUT:%^ik               VerbAppl4;
        +REV:%^ur                VerbAppl4;
        +REV:%^uk                VerbAppl4;
	VerbPass;
	
LEXICON VerbAppl4
	+BEN:%^ir			VerbPass;
	+RECIP:%^an			VerbPass;
	+RECIP:%^any			VerbPass;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	VerbAppl2;
        +NEUT:%^ik               VerbPass;
        +REV:%^ur                VerbPass;
        +REV:%^uk                VerbPass;
	VerbPass;

LEXICON VerbPass
	+PASS:%#w	VerbHabit;
	VerbHabit;

LEXICON VerbHabit
        +HAB.PAST2:%^ag        VerbAspect;
        VerbAspect;

LEXICON VerbAspect
	+IMP:%^a		VerbIntensive;

LEXICON PastVerbAppl
	+BEN:%^ir			PastVerbAppl2;
	+RECIP:%^an			PastVerbAppl2;
	+RECIP:%^any			PastVerbAppl2;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	PastVerbAppl2;
        +NEUT:%^ik               PastVerbAppl2;
        +REV:%^ur                PastVerbAppl2;
        +REV:%^uk                PastVerbAppl2;
	PastVerbPass;

LEXICON PastVerbAppl2
	+BEN:%^ir			PastVerbAppl3;
	+RECIP:%^an			PastVerbAppl3;
	+RECIP:%^any			PastVerbAppl3;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	PastVerbAppl3;
        +NEUT:%^ik               PastVerbAppl3;
        +REV:%^ur                PastVerbAppl3;
        +REV:%^uk                PastVerbAppl3;
	PastVerbPass;
	
LEXICON PastVerbAppl3
	+BEN:%^ir			PastVerbAppl4;
	+RECIP:%^an			PastVerbAppl4;
	+RECIP:%^any			PastVerbAppl4;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	PastVerbAppl4;
        +NEUT:%^ik               PastVerbAppl4;
        +REV:%^ur                PastVerbAppl4;
        +REV:%^uk                PastVerbAppl4;
	PastVerbPass;
	
LEXICON PastVerbAppl4
	+BEN:%^ir			PastVerbPass;
	+RECIP:%^an			PastVerbPass;
	+RECIP:%^any			PastVerbPass;
	+INSTorCAUS:%^ish	PastVerbPass;
        +NEUT:%^ik               PastVerbPass;
        +REV:%^ur                PastVerbPass;
        +REV:%^uk                PastVerbPass;
	PastVerbPass;

LEXICON PastVerbPass
	+PASS:%#w	PastAspect;
	PastAspect;

LEXICON PastAspect
	+PERF:%^e	VerbIntensive;

LEXICON VerbIntensive
	+REPEATEDLY:%^gura	VerbLoc;
	0:0			VerbLoc;

LEXICON VerbLoc
	+LOC:%^mo	#;
	+LOC:%^ho	#;
	+LOC:%^yo	#;
	#;

LEXICON NounRootHelper
	+:%^		NounRoot;
	+PROPER:%^       ProperNounHelper;
        +GUESS+:0       NounGuess;
    

LEXICON VerbStem
        andik		VerbAppl;
        ats		VerbAppl;
        banziriz		VerbAppl;
        bik		VerbAppl;
        bor		VerbAppl;
        bwir		VerbAppl;
        capish		VerbAppl;
        cukur		VerbAppl;
        cyah		VerbAppl;
        egam		VerbAppl;
        ereker		VerbAppl;
        fudik		VerbAppl;
        gagaz		VerbAppl;
        gemurir		VerbAppl;
        ges		VerbAppl;
        gororok		VerbAppl;
        gwiz		VerbAppl;
        hamb		VerbAppl;
        hanuk		VerbAppl;
        hemur		VerbAppl;
        hin		VerbAppl;
        hober		VerbAppl;
        hoz		VerbAppl;
        humuk		VerbAppl;
        ib		VerbAppl;
        icum		VerbAppl;
        iger		VerbAppl;
        ikang		VerbAppl;
        inging		VerbAppl;
        irir		VerbAppl;
        it		VerbAppl;
        itur		VerbAppl;
        iyubah		VerbAppl;
        jurir		VerbAppl;
        kanur		VerbAppl;
        ker		VerbAppl;
        kiranuk		VerbAppl;
        koper		VerbAppl;
        kumir		VerbAppl;
        kurur		VerbAppl;
        meny		VerbAppl;
        namb		VerbAppl;
        noz		VerbAppl;
        oherez		VerbAppl;
        oror		VerbAppl;
        pfund		VerbAppl;
        rag		VerbAppl;
        rangar		VerbAppl;
        reg		VerbAppl;
        ribat		VerbAppl;
        robanur		VerbAppl;
        rorez		VerbAppl;
        rut		VerbAppl;
        s		VerbAppl;
        samban		VerbAppl;
        sek		VerbAppl;
        sesengur		VerbAppl;
        shengur		VerbAppl;
        shishur		VerbAppl;
        shyigikir		VerbAppl;
        sind		VerbAppl;
        sokoz		VerbAppl;
        suk		VerbAppl;
        tagaguz		VerbAppl;
        tangaz		VerbAppl;
        tekererez		VerbAppl;
        toh		VerbAppl;
        tumvir		VerbAppl;
        umiz		VerbAppl;
        vunderez		VerbAppl;
        zimir		VerbAppl;
        igoronzor		VerbAppl;
        ror		VerbAppl;
        jundik		VerbAppl;
        jor		VerbAppl;
        iyoberany		VerbAppl;
        kinantur		VerbAppl;
        ijyan		VerbAppl;
LEXICON VerbPastStem
	ambur:ambuy		PastVerbAppl;
	anur:anuz		PastVerbAppl;
	baduk:baduts		PastVerbAppl;
	barw:baw		PastVerbAppl;
	bih:bishy		PastVerbAppl;
	bonek:bonets		PastVerbAppl;
	burir:buriy		PastVerbAppl;
	byiruk:byiruts		PastVerbAppl;
	cengez:cengej		PastVerbAppl;
	cugus:cugushij		PastVerbAppl;
	curik:curits		PastVerbAppl;
	dases:dashesh		PastVerbAppl;
	egurir:eguriy		PastVerbAppl;
	esur:esuy		PastVerbAppl;
	fotorw:fotow		PastVerbAppl;
	gabiz:gabij		PastVerbAppl;
	garagar:garagay		PastVerbAppl;
	geng:genz		PastVerbAppl;
	gingimirany:gingimiranij		PastVerbAppl;
	gum:guy		PastVerbAppl;
	hab:haby		PastVerbAppl;
	hamban:hambany		PastVerbAppl;
	hangar:hangay		PastVerbAppl;
	hatw:hasw		PastVerbAppl;
	hend:henz		PastVerbAppl;
	hig:hiz		PastVerbAppl;
	hinyur:hinyuy		PastVerbAppl;
	hondagur:hondaguy		PastVerbAppl;
	hoz:hojej		PastVerbAppl;
	human:humany		PastVerbAppl;
	hunguk:hunguts		PastVerbAppl;
	ibon:ibony		PastVerbAppl;
	ifat:ifash		PastVerbAppl;
	igomw:igomw		PastVerbAppl;
	ikir:ikiz		PastVerbAppl;
	inub:inuby		PastVerbAppl;
	iriz:irij		PastVerbAppl;
	isumbur:isumbuy		PastVerbAppl;
	itsamur:itsamuy		PastVerbAppl;
	iyiriz:iyirij		PastVerbAppl;
	jijw:jijw		PastVerbAppl;
	kangish:kangishij		PastVerbAppl;
	ken:kenny		PastVerbAppl;
	king:kinz		PastVerbAppl;
	komang:komanz		PastVerbAppl;
	koresh:koreshej		PastVerbAppl;
	kun:kunny		PastVerbAppl;
	kurur:kuruy		PastVerbAppl;
	murik:murits		PastVerbAppl;
	nyuguz:nyuguj		PastVerbAppl;
	pakir:pakiy		PastVerbAppl;
	rambik:rambits		PastVerbAppl;
	remb:remby		PastVerbAppl;
	rog:roz		PastVerbAppl;
	rushy:ruhij		PastVerbAppl;
	sakuz:sakuj		PastVerbAppl;
	senyaguran:senyagurany		PastVerbAppl;
	shinguk:shinguts		PastVerbAppl;
	shyinguk:shyinguts		PastVerbAppl;
	sohor:sohoy		PastVerbAppl;
	sur:suy		PastVerbAppl;
	tang:tanz		PastVerbAppl;
	ter:tey		PastVerbAppl;
	tirish:tij		PastVerbAppl;
	tuk:tuts		PastVerbAppl;
	tyar:tyay		PastVerbAppl;
	vug:vuz		PastVerbAppl;
	yaz:yagij		PastVerbAppl;
	ziz:zij		PastVerbAppl;
	iman:imany		PastVerbAppl;
	ror:roy		PastVerbAppl;
	sun:sunny		PastVerbAppl;
	fangur:fanguy		PastVerbAppl;
	komanyiriz:komanyirij		PastVerbAppl;
	er:ez		PastVerbAppl;
	bikur:bikuy		PastVerbAppl;
	eng:enz		PastVerbAppl;
	pfubur:pfubuy		PastVerbAppl;
